Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2238
Licenses issued under Licensed Practical Nurse-Certified Practice Act; how treated.

On and after November 1, 2017, all licenses issued pursuant to the Licensed Practical Nurse-Certified Practice Act before such date shall be renewed as licenses to practice as a licensed practical nurse pursuant to section 38-2221.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 74.